en: Stump size: Boys (25 in); Custom; Junior (27 in); Senior (28 in); Standard; Youth (25 in); Other
pt-BR: Estaca de críquete tamanho: Infantil (25 pol.); Personalizado; Júnior (27 pol.); Sênior (28 pol.); Padrão; Jovem (25 pol.); Outros
pl: Rozmiar słupków: Chłopięce (25 cali); Niestandardowe; Juniorskie (27 cali); Seniorskie (28 cali); Standardowe; Młodzieżowe (25 cali); Inne
lt-LT: Kriketo vartelių dydis: Berniukų (25 col.); Pasirinktinis; Jaunių (27 col.); Suaugusiųjų (28 col.); Standartinis; Jaunuolių (25 col.); Kitas
tr: Kriket direği beden sınıfı: Erkek çocuk (25 inç); Özel; Junior (27 inç); Yetişkin (28 inç); Standart; Genç (25 inç); Diğer
bg-BG: Размер на колчетата: Момчета (25 инча); По поръчка; Юноши (27 инча); Мъже (28 инча); Стандартен; Младежи (25 инча); Друго
da: Cricketstumpstørrelse: Drenge (25 tommer); Tilpasset; Junior (27 tommer); Senior (28 tommer); Standard; Unge (25 tommer); Andet
zh-CN: 门柱尺寸: 男童（25 英寸）; 定制; 青少年（27 英寸）; 成人（28 英寸）; 标准; 青年（25 英寸）; 其他
nb: Stumpstørrelse: Gutter (25 tommer); Tilpasset; Junior (27 tommer); Senior (28 tommer); Standard; Ungdom (25 tommer); Annet
nl: Stump maat: Jongens (25 inch); Aangepast; Junior (27 inch); Senior (28 inch); Standaard; Jeugd (25 inch); Overig
sl-SI: Velikost kriket količka: Deški (25 in); Po meri; Mladinski (27 in); Članski (28 in); Standardni; Najstniški (25 in); Drugo
cs: Velikost pálky: Chlapecká (25"); Vlastní; Juniorská (27"); Seniorská (28"); Standardní; Mládežnická (25"); Jiné
vi: Gốc cây kích: Bé trai (25 in); Tùy chỉnh; Thiếu niên (27 in); Người lớn (28 in); Tiêu chuẩn; Thanh thiếu niên (25 in); Khác
th: ขนาดของเสาประตู: เด็กผู้ชาย (25 นิ้ว); กำหนดเอง; เด็กโต (27 นิ้ว); ผู้ใหญ่ (28 นิ้ว); มาตรฐาน; เยาวชน (25 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Veličina panja: Dječaci (25 in); Prilagođeno; Juniori (27 in); Seniori (28 in); Standard; Mladi (25 in); Ostalo
sv: Stumpstorlek: Pojkar (25 tum); Anpassad; Junior (27 tum); Senior (28 tum); Standard; Ungdom (25 tum); Övrigt
de: Größe des Cricket-Stumpfs: Jungen (25 Zoll); Benutzerdefiniert; Junior (27 Zoll); Senior (28 Zoll); Standard; Jugend (25 Zoll); Sonstige
sk-SK: Veľkosť kolíka: Chlapčenské (25 palcov); Vlastné; Juniorské (27 palcov); Seniorské (28 palcov); Štandardné; Mládežnícke (25 palcov); Iné
ja: 切り株のサイズ: ボーイズ (25インチ); カスタム; ジュニア (27インチ); シニア (28インチ); スタンダード; ユース (25インチ); その他
zh-TW: 柱門尺寸: 男童 (25 吋); 自訂; 少年 (27 吋); 成人 (28 吋); 標準; 青少年 (25 吋); 其他
ko: 스텀프 사이즈: 보이즈(25인치); 맞춤형; 주니어(27인치); 시니어(28인치); 표준형; 유스(25인치); 기타
ru: Размер калитки: Для мальчиков (25 дюймов); Индивидуальный; Юниорский (27 дюймов); Взрослый (28 дюймов); Стандартный; Подростковый (25 дюймов); Другое
ro-RO: Mărimea jaloanelor de cricket: Băieți (25 in); Personalizat; Junior (27 in); Senior (28 in); Standard; Tineret (25 in); Altele
hu: Kapuméret: Fiú (25 hüvelyk); Egyedi; Junior (27 hüvelyk); Szenior (28 hüvelyk); Normál; Ifjúsági (25 hüvelyk); Egyéb
fi: Keppien koko: Pojat (25 in); Mukautettu; Junior (27 in); Senior (28 in); Vakio; Nuoret (25 in); Muu
es: Tamaño del tocón: Niños (25 in); Personalizado; Júnior (27 in); Sénior (28 in); Estándar; Juvenil (25 in); Otro
it: Dimensione del paletto: Ragazzi (25 in); Personalizzato; Junior (27 in); Senior (28 in); Standard; Giovani (25 in); Altro
pt-PT: Tamanho dos cepos: Rapazes (25 pol.); Personalizado; Júnior (27 pol.); Sénior (28 pol.); Padrão; Jovens (25 pol.); Outro
el: Μέγεθος stump: Για αγόρια (25 in); Προσαρμοσμένο; Εφηβικό (27 in); Ενηλίκων (28 in); Τυπικό; Παιδικό (25 in); Άλλο
fr: Taille du piquet: Garçons (25 po); Personnalisé; Junior (27 po); Senior (28 po); Standard; Jeunes (25 po); Autre